Nevada, session 83, AB260.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 442 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 to 6, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Abortion” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 442.240.
Sec. 4. “Abortion services provider” means any medical
facility, clinic or provider of health care that performs or assists in
the performance of an abortion.
Sec. 5. “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
Sec. 6. “Post-abortion counseling and support services”
means any service or resource offered to a person after an
abortion to address physical, emotional, mental or spiritual needs
related to the abortion, including, without limitation:
1. Professional counseling;
2. Peer support groups;
3. Spiritual or faith-based guidance; or
4. Medical follow-up care.
Sec. 7. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 8. 1. An abortion services provider shall:
(a) Compile a list of names and contact information of persons
offering post-abortion counseling and support services in the area
where the abortion services provider is located;
(b) Ensure that a copy of the list compiled pursuant to
paragraph (a) is provided to each patient on whom the abortion
services provider performs an abortion before or immediately after
the abortion;
(c) Review and update the list compiled pursuant to paragraph
(a) at least annually to ensure accuracy and compliance with the
requirements of this section; and
(d) Display copies of the list compiled pursuant to paragraph
(a) in a clearly visible and accessible place within the waiting
room or another public area of the location where the abortion
services provider performs abortions.
2. The list compiled pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be clearly labeled as “Post-Abortion Counseling and
Support Services”; and
-
*AB260*

– 3 –
(b) Include, without limitation, notice that a person may take a
list without making a request or inquiry to the abortion services
provider.
3. An abortion services provider shall not exclude any person
offering post-abortion counseling and support services from the
list compiled pursuant to subsection 1 due to the religious
affiliation or beliefs of the person.
4. The list compiled pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include, without limitation:
(1) Persons offering post-abortion counseling and support
services from a secular perspective; and
(2) Persons offering post-abortion counseling and support
services from a faith-based perspective; and
(b) Be available in printed and digital formats.
Sec. 9. 1. The Division shall ensure abortion services
providers are in compliance with the requirements of section 8 of
this act.
2. If an abortion services provider fails to comply with any
provision of section 8 of this act, the Division:
(a) Shall provide a written warning for a first violation; and
(b) May impose a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each
subsequent violation.
Sec. 10. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 11. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB260*